Utah statutes.
75-4-101.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Local administration" means administration by a personal representative
appointed in this state pursuant to appointment proceedings described in
Chapter 3.
(2)  "Local personal representative" includes any personal representative
appointed in this state pursuant to appointment proceedings described in
Chapter 3 and excludes foreign personal representatives who acquire the power
of a local personal representative under Section 75-4-205.
(3)  "Resident creditor" means a person domiciled in, or doing business in
this state, who is, or could be, a claimant against an estate of a nonresident
decedent.
